Maryland, session 2025, HB1079.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) The Public Service Commission shall conduct a study on the electric
transmission system and electric distribution system in the State.
(b) The purpose of the study is to provide a comprehensive assessment of the
potential application of grid–enhancing technologies and advanced conductors in a manner
that ensures system reliability and safeguards the cybersecurity and physical security of
the electric transmission system and electric distribution system in Maryland.
(c) The study shall:
(1) identify present and reasonably foreseeable future inadequacies in the
electric transmission system in the State;
(2) identify alternatives to building transmission lines, including
grid–enhancing technologies such as:
(i) dynamic line rating;
(ii) power flow controllers;
(iii) topology optimization; and
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1079*

HOUSE BILL 1079
(iv) other hardware or software designed to reduce congestion or
enhance the flexibility of the electric transmission system;
(3) identify economic, environmental, and social issues associated with
each alternative identified under item (2) of this subsection;
(4) summarize any public input, the role of local government, and any other
stakeholder involvement in the identifications made under items (1), (2), and (3) of this
subsection; and
(5) identify investments necessary to modernize the electric transmission
system and electric distribution system by:
(i) enhancing reliability;
(ii) improving security against cyber and physical threats; and
(iii) increasing energy conservation by facilitating communication
between utilities and their customers through the use of:
1. two–way meters;
2. control technologies;
3. energy storage;
4. microgrids;
5. demand response; and
6. any other innovative technologies.
(d) The Public Service Commission may use information and analyses from
regional transmission organizations to comply with the requirements of this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before January 1, 2026,
the Public Service Commission shall report its findings to the Governor and, in accordance
with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the Senate Committee on Education,
Energy, and the Environment and the House Economic Matters Committee.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.